Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4809
Initial mediation meeting.

After receiving a mediation request under section 2-4808, the farm mediation service shall send a mediation meeting notice to all the consenting parties setting a time and place for an initial mediation meeting between the parties and a mediator associated with the farm mediation service. Adequate preparation by all parties shall be advised by the farm mediation service prior to the mediation meeting. An initial mediation meeting shall be held within forty days after receiving the mediation request or as otherwise agreed by the parties.

Laws 1988, LB 664, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 200, § 4.